Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.020

Code of conduct—Verification—Penalty. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A lobbyist who is registered under RCW 29B.50.010 before December 31, 2019, is required to update the lobbyist's registration materials to include the attestation required by RCW 29B.50.010(1)(j) by December 31, 2019.

(2) The commission shall revoke the registration of any lobbyist registered under RCW 29B.50.010 who does not comply with subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The commission may not impose any other penalty on a lobbyist registered under RCW 29B.50.010 for failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section.

(4) The commission shall collaborate with the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate to develop a process to verify that lobbyists who submit an attestation under RCW 29B.50.010(1)(j) have completed the training course provided under RCW 44.04.390.

[ 2024 c 164 s 474; 2019 c 469 s 4. Formerly RCW 42.17A.603.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.